Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-431
Treatment, defined.

Treatment means a therapy, modality, product, device, or other intervention used to maintain well being or to diagnose, assess, alleviate, or prevent a disability, injury, illness, disease, or other similar condition.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 31.